trunk/incubator/da.olddic.dix
    <pardef n="mail__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menneske__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="duel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/og__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogen</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øgerne</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øger</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ja__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paryk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ker</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pik__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/ånd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænderne</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænder</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ånden</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ånd</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fløjl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="æg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>get</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mis__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>serne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ser</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="afladsbrev"><i>afladsbrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktiebrev"><i>aktiebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anfald"><i>anfald</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="år"><i>år</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atlasblad"><i>atlasblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bænk"><i>bænk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beboelseshus"><i>beboelseshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bidrag"><i>bidrag</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bindingsværkshus"><i>bindingsværkshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blodbad"><i>blodbad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bogskab"><i>bogskab</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="borgerbrev"><i>borgerbrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brændeskur"><i>brændeskur</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brøl"><i>brøl</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bugt"><i>bugt</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="busk"><i>busk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="containerskib"><i>containerskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dal"><i>dal</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dej"><i>dej</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dokumentnavn"><i>dokumentnavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drog"><i>drog</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dybdemål"><i>dybdemål</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eg"><i>eg</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elfenbenstårn"><i>elfenbenstårn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etplanshus"><i>etplanshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fagblad"><i>fagblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fejl"><i>fejl</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiksersalt"><i>fiksersalt</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firetagershus"><i>firetagershus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjeld"><i>fjeld</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fløj"><i>fløj</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fortegn"><i>fortegn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrskib"><i>fyrskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gavflab"><i>gavflab</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grav"><i>grav</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="havehus"><i>havehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="horehus"><i>horehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ildebrandshus"><i>ildebrandshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kælk"><i>kælk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirkeskib"><i>kirkeskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="køb"><i>køb</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kræmmerhus"><i>kræmmerhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kurv"><i>kurv</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lavenergihus"><i>lavenergihus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lugt"><i>lugt</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="middelhavsland"><i>middelhavsland</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="navn"><i>navn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ophold"><i>ophold</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="overfald"><i>overfald</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pilk"><i>pilk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puds"><i>puds</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rettelsesblad"><i>rettelsesblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rutsj"><i>rutsj</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="segl"><i>segl</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjippetov"><i>sjippetov</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skilderhus"><i>skilderhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skråtag"><i>skråtag</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slagskib"><i>slagskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sminkebord"><i>sminkebord</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sol"><i>sol</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spisebord"><i>spisebord</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="standur"><i>standur</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="storm"><i>storm</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="surretov"><i>surretov</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="syn"><i>syn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tebrev"><i>tebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ting"><i>ting</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tov"><i>tov</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trusselsbrev"><i>trusselsbrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udland"><i>udland</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="våbenvåningshus"><i>våbenvåningshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vandtårn"><i>vandtårn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrinsk"><i>vrinsk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
